Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Unlawful Acts

54-1-201. Contracts in which officers of department of transportation or relatives interested prohibited and void.

No contract shall be let to or made with any person in which any officer of the department of transportation is interested, directly or indirectly, or with whom any officer of the department is knowingly related, either by blood or marriage within the fourth degree, computing by the civil law. Nor shall any stockholder or other person in any way interested in any firm or corporation be related within the fourth degree to any member of the department. Neither shall any engineer in the employ of the department have any interest in any contract or be knowingly related within the fourth degree to any person interested in the contract. Any contract where the interest or relationship exists shall be void.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 7; Shan., § 1720a29b33 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b64; Code 1932, § 3224; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-117; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Collateral References. Highways
90 et seq.

54-1-202. Offense for official to enter into certain contracts.

It is a Class E felony for any officer of the department to enter knowingly into any contract under this chapter and chapters 2, 4, and 5 of this title with:

Any person related to the officer or to any other officer of the department within the fourth degree;

Any corporation in which the officer or any other member of the department is interested, directly or indirectly; or

Any corporation in which any person knowingly related to the officer is interested, directly or indirectly.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 8; Shan., § 1720a29b34 (p. 6551); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b65; Code 1932, § 3225; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-118; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1989, ch. 591, § 51.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

54-1-203. Felonious acts of officers or employees enumerated.

It is also a Class E felony for any officer of the department, or for any person in the employ of the officer, to commit any fraudulent act whatever with respect to the expenditure of the funds mentioned in this chapter and chapters 2, 4, and 5 of this title, among the counties entitled to the funds, or otherwise, or in respect to the designation or laying out of any road, making plans and specifications for the road, advertising for bids, receiving bids, letting or making contracts, approving or accepting roads, bridges, etc., or otherwise in any manner whatsoever acting in bad faith in respect to any duty imposed upon any of the officials, engineers, or other employees, by this chapter and chapters 2, 4, and 5 of this title, or by doing any prohibited act, or failing willfully to discharge any duty required, whether any actual loss or damage results from the act or failure to act or not.

Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 8; Shan., § 1720a29b35 (p. 6552); Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b66; Code 1932, § 3226; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-119; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1989, ch. 591, § 52.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

54-1-204. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 54-1-204 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 8; Shan., § 1720a29b36; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b67; mod. Code 1932, § 3227; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-120), concerning punishment for convictions of felonies, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 1993.

54-1-205. Employee encouraging purchase of particular material or product unlawful.

It is unlawful for any employee of the department of transportation to encourage in any manner the purchase of any particular material or product or to assist in the initiation of requisitions for any materials or products to be purchased by any department of this state when such employee is directly interested as defined in § 12-4-101 in such material or product.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 161, § 1 (Williams, § 3227.1); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-121; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 2; T.C.A. § 54-1-206; Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 54-1-206 was transferred to subsection (b) of this section by the code commission in 2008.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “this state when such employee is directly interested as defined in § 12-4-101 in such material or product” for “the state of Tennessee” at the end of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

54-1-206. [Transferred.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 54-1-206 (Acts 1953, ch. 161, § 2 (Williams, § 3227.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-122; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning penalty for violations of § 54-1-205, was transferred to § 54-1-205(b) by the code commission in 2008.